South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3283.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 16-23-420(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a person to possess a firearm of any kind on any premises or property owned, operated, or controlled by a private or public school, college, university, technical college, other post-secondary postsecondary institution, or in any publicly owned building, without the express permission of the authorities in charge of the premises or property. The provisions of contained in this subsection related to any premises or property owned, operated, or controlled by a private or public school, college, university, technical college, or other post-secondary institution, do not apply to when the firearm remains inside an attended or locked motor vehicle and is secured in a closed glove compartment, closed console, closed trunk, or in a closed container secured by an integral fastener and transported in the luggage compartment of the vehicle. The provisions contained in this subsection related to any premises or property owned, operated, or controlled by a college, university, technical college, or other postsecondary institution do not apply to a person who is authorized to carry a concealed weapon pursuant to Article 4, Chapter 31, Title 23. SECTION 2.  Section 16-23-20(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful, whether or not the person has a concealed weapon permit, for anyone to carry about the person any handgun, whether concealed or not, unless otherwise specifically authorized by law into a: (1) law enforcement, correctional, or detention facility; (2) courthouse, courtroom, or other publicly owned building, whether owned by the State, a county, a municipality, or other political subdivision, where court is held and during the time that court is in session; (3) polling place on election days; (4) office of or business meeting of the governing body of a county, public school district, municipality, or special purpose district; (5) school or college athletic event not related to firearms; (6) daycare facility or preschool facility; (7) place where the carrying of firearms is prohibited by federal law; (8) church or other established religious sanctuary unless express permission is given by the appropriate church official or governing body; (9) hospital, medical clinic, doctor's office, or any other facility where medical services or procedures are performed, unless expressly authorized by the appropriate entity; (10) residence or dwelling place of another person without the express permission of the owner or person in legal control or possession of the residence or dwelling place, as appropriate; or (11) place clearly marked with a sign prohibiting the carrying of a concealable weapon on the premises in compliance with Section 23-31-235. A person who violates a provision of this item, whether the violation is wilful or not, only may be charged with a violation of Section 16-11-620 and must not be charged with or penalized for a violation of this subsection. SECTION 3.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----